California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) The application shall either be approved or denied by the commission within 180 days of its receipt, except that, if the commission requests additional information from the applicant, the time for approving or denying the application shall be calculated from the date that the commission receives the
 additional information requested.

(c) If the commission denies an application, it shall state the specific reasons for that denial and may, in its discretion, permit the application to be amended to remove those grounds for denial. The commission shall have 180 days from the receipt of an amended application to either approve or deny the amended application.

(d) The commission shall not deny any application which meets the requirements of this part and which conforms to the regulations and guidelines of the commission for the award of grants, nor shall the commission unreasonably delay the approval of an application which substantially conforms to those requirements if the applicant agrees to allow the commission to modify the application to meet its conditions for approval.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99665.

(a) To be eligible for a grant for a rail transit project pursuant to Section 99630, subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 99631, subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 99632, Section 99633, 99634, 99635, 99637, subdivision (b) of Section 99638, Section 99639, subdivision (b) of Section 99640, Section 99641, 99642, 99643, 99644, or 99645, an applicant agency shall match on a dollar-for-dollar basis, the amount of the grant from other public or private sources and shall demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the commission, the
 availability of those other funds.

(b) Local agencies shall not adopt new or increased development taxes, fees, or exactions or permit fees for the purpose of providing matching funds for any grant specified in subdivision (a) or to pay for operating costs of new service established by a grant made pursuant to this part.

(c) Bridge toll revenues otherwise available to a local agency may be used as a source of matching funds.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99666.

The eligibility of an applicant agency for a grant pursuant to a section of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 99620) does not make it ineligible to apply for and receive a grant pursuant to any other provision of that chapter.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99667.

(a) An application for a grant for a commuter rail or rail transit project within the area of jurisdiction of a transportation planning agency, as defined in Sections 29532 and 29532.4 of the Government Code, shall be subject to the grant review authority of the transportation planning agency.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99668.

Each application for a grant to fund a segment of a commuter rail project shall demonstrate that the project is coordinated with all other planned and existing connecting commuter and intercity services, to maximize their efficiency and service to the people in the region.

(b) If practicable, a joint maintenance facility shall be developed for commuter and other rail equipment at a central location in Southern California.

(c) In order to maximize efficiency and avoid duplication of effort, a single joint powers agency may be established to implement and operate all commuter rail services in Southern California.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99669.

An application for rail transit extension shall include a plan for integrating bus service with the rail line and for avoiding duplicative and competing bus service. The commission shall submit the application to a peer review committee of at least three persons which shall evaluate the adequacy of the local agency’s transit integration plan. The peer review committee shall be appointed by the commission from persons recommended by the department and shall include representatives of transit operators. The local agency shall either implement
 recommendations of the peer review committee or indicate why the recommendations are not being implemented. The commission shall review the adequacy of the transit integration plan before approving the rail transit extension.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Conditions [99680. - 99686.]

99680.

Funds allocated pursuant to this part shall not be used for any of the following:

(a) A rail project connecting San Bernardino County and the State of Nevada. 

(b) Any alteration to the Golden Gate Bridge.

(c) Passenger rail facilities which would not be available to the general public or whose primary purpose would be to benefit a private entity or individual.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99681.

Funds shall not be allocated for a project requiring service over the right-of-way of a railroad corporation unless a course of improvements and operation is agreed to by the railroad corporation or unless the right-of-way, or all or part of use of the right-of-way, is acquired by eminent domain or purchase. New or increased passenger service over the right-of-way of a railroad corporation shall be implemented in a manner which ensures the adequacy and efficiency of existing freight service. Neither the specific amounts allocated pursuant to Chapter 3
 (commencing with Section 99620), nor any other provision of this part, are intended to indicate the actual fair market value of any railroad right-of-way to be acquired or leased.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99682.

All passenger rail and water borne ferry equipment and facilities acquired or constructed pursuant to this part and intended for public use shall be accessible to persons with physical disabilities, including wheelchair users. All passenger vehicles and vessels shall be accessible to wheelchair users at all stops, stations and terminals whether or not staffed.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99683.

All passenger vehicles and vessels acquired pursuant to this part shall provide reasonable access to bicycles. All stations acquired or constructed pursuant to this part shall provide convenient and secure bicycle parking facilities.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99684.

(a) All funds allocated to an agency pursuant to this part shall be programmed, encumbered, obligated, or spent prior to July 1, 2000, unless economically infeasible. If funds allocated to an agency pursuant to this part are not expended or encumbered prior to July 1, 2000, the Legislature may, by a statute passed in each house by a two-thirds vote, reallocate those funds for another rail project within that agency’s jurisdiction.

(b) If any of the funds are not
 expended or encumbered prior to July 1, 2010, the Legislature may, in the same manner, reallocate the funds for any other passenger rail project in the state.

(c) In the case of funds allocated to the department, the reallocation shall be for a state-sponsored passenger rail project.

(d) The Legislature may, by statute passed in each house by majority vote, or in the annual Budget Bill, require the commission to award any grant specified in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 99620) which the commission has denied.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99684.5.

(a) Funds allocated pursuant to this part that are not expended or encumbered by July 1, 2020, are hereby reallocated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 99684 to any other existing passenger rail project with existing rail service.

(b) The California Transportation Commission shall select the projects for the reallocation described in subdivision (a). The high-speed rail project as described in Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 2704) of Division 3 of the Streets and Highways Code is not eligible to receive reallocated funds pursuant to subdivision (a) as it is not providing existing rail service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 222.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

99685.

If, within one year after the commission has denied any grant specified in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 99620), the Legislature does not require the commission to award the grant pursuant to Section 99684, the Governor may direct the commission to award the grant if the Governor finds that the applicant for the grant is in substantial compliance with the requirements of this part.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99686.

Every expenditure made pursuant to this part shall be made in compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Bonds [99690. - 99696.]

99690.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Clean Air and Transportation Improvement Bond Act of 1990.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99690.5.

Bonds in the total amount of one billion nine hundred ninety million dollars ($1,990,000,000), exclusive of refunding bonds, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this part and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged
 for the punctual payment of both principal and interest as they become due and payable.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99691.

The proceeds of bonds and notes issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Clean Air and Transportation Improvement Fund created by Section 99610.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99691.5.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all provisions of that law shall apply to the bonds and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99692.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the Transportation Improvement Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this chapter, the Transportation Improvement Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee shall consist of the Controller, the Director of Finance, and the Treasurer, or their designated representatives. The Treasurer shall
 serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, the commission is hereby designated as “the board.”

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99692.5.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out this part, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those purposes progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99693.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99693.5.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for the purposes of this part, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum which is necessary to carry out Section 99694,
 appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99694.

For the purposes of carrying out this part, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out those provisions. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund from money received from the sale of bonds which would otherwise be deposited in the fund.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99694.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is
 excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

99694.5.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account in the General Fund, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, to carry out this part. The amount of the loan shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purposes of this chapter. The board shall execute any documents as required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be
 allocated in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99695.

All money derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99695.5.

Any bonds issued or sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded by the issuance of refunding bonds in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Approval by the electors of the state for the issuance of the bonds shall include approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99696.

The people of California hereby find and declare that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this part are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitation imposed by that article.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 12. SANTA CLARA VALLEY TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY [100000. - 100619.]



  CHAPTER 1. Title of Act and Policy [100000. - 100002.]

100000.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority Act.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

100001.

It is necessary that a transit district be established in the County of Santa Clara in order to meet the public transit problems of that county. Because there is no general law under which such a district could be formed, the adoption of a special act and the formation of a special district is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

100001.5.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares:

(a) Since the formation of the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority, unprecedented growth has occurred in the San Francisco Bay area and in Santa Clara County in particular. It has become apparent that additional measures are required in order to deal more effectively with the resultant serious traffic congestion and to foster the development of trade and the movement of people in and around the Santa Clara Valley and throughout the entire bay area.

(b) Transit and other modes of transportation are inextricably intertwined, and improvement and maintenance of the road and highway structure in conjunction and coordination with
 transit improvements are essential to optimize the ability of the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority to deal more effectively with serious traffic congestion.

(c) The Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority, having been designated as the Congestion Management Agency for Santa Clara County, and already authorized to construct and improve state and local highways pursuant to Section 100115.5, is uniquely positioned to implement programs to achieve the goal of a balanced approach to solving transportation problems.

(d) This goal is best achieved in Santa Clara County by vesting in the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority the ability to plan, design, construct, maintain, and repair road and highway improvements, as well as bicycle, pedestrian, and other transportation facilities, under the conditions set forth in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 2.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100002.

The Santa Clara County Transit District is renamed the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority. Any reference in this part, or in any other provision of law or regulation, to the Santa Clara County Transit District shall be deemed to refer to the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority. Nothing in the act that added this section alters, impairs, or terminates the district’s status as a transit district, and as an ongoing legal entity, or any of its legal obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [100010. - 100022.]

100010.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

100011.

“VTA” means the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 3.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100012.

“Transit” means the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage by any means, and includes rapid transit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 373, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

100013.

“Transit works” or “transit facilities” means any or all real and personal property, equipment, rights, or interests owned or to be acquired by the VTA for transit service or purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 4.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100014.

“Board of directors” and “board” means the board of directors of the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 5.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100014.1.

“Director” means a member of the board of directors of the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 6.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100015.

“County” means the County of Santa Clara.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

100016.

“Public agency” includes the State of California, and any county, city and county, city, district, or other political subdivision or public entity of, or organized under the laws of, this state, or any department, instrumentality or agency thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

100017.

“System” means all transit works and transit facilities owned or held or to be owned or held by the VTA for transit purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 7.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100018.

“Revenues” means all rates, fares, tolls, rentals, or other income and revenue actually received or receivable by or for the account of the VTA from the operation of the system, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, interest allowed on any moneys or securities and any profits derived from the sale of any securities and any consideration in any way derived from any properties owned, operated, or at any time maintained by the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 8.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100019.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, copartnership, association, corporation, trust, limited liability company, business trust or receiver or trustee or conservator for any thereof, but does not include a public agency, as defined in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 373, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

100020.

“Establish” includes establish, construct, complete, acquire, extend, or reroute. It does not, however, include the maintenance and operation of any existing system acquired by the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 9.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100021.

“Existing system” means any transit service or system of a publicly or privately owned public utility or division thereof operating entirely within Santa Clara County or at least 40 percent of whose revenue vehicle miles for the preceding calendar year were operated within the district but does not include a charter-party carrier or the charter service of a passenger stage corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

100022.

“Transportation works” or “transportation facilities” means any or all real and personal property, rights, or interests owned or to be acquired by the VTA to facilitate the passage of vehicles or pedestrians exclusive of transit works and transit facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 10.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Formation of District [100030. - 100031.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [100030. - 100031.]

100030.

The Legislature recognizes the formation of the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority and it may exercise the powers herein granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 11.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100031.

The boundaries of the VTA shall include all incorporated and unincorporated territory lying within the County of Santa Clara.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 12.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Existing Systems [100055. - 100055.4.]

100055.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, before the VTA may establish any transit service or system that may at any time divert, lessen, or compete for the patronage or revenues of any existing system, the VTA shall give a written notice to the public utility that is operating the existing system. The written notice shall describe the transit service or system which the VTA proposes to establish and shall state the time that the VTA proposes to establish that service or system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 15.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100055.1.

The VTA shall not establish the proposed service or system, or maintain and operate the service or system until it has completed the purchase of the existing system or any part thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 16.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100055.2.

Subject to Section 100351, the purchase price to be paid for the existing system, or any portion thereof to be purchased, shall be the reproduction cost new, including going concern value, at the date upon which the VTA commences negotiations for the purchase of the existing system, or the portion of the existing system, less depreciation, including wear, tear, and obsolescence, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 17.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100055.3.

The VTA and public utility operating the existing system may agree upon the purchase price or they may agree that the purchase price is to be established by arbitration and upon the method of naming arbitrators and the method of conducting such arbitration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 18.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100055.4.

Section 851 does not apply to any contract for sale or sale of an existing system, or any portion thereof, pursuant to this chapter, and the Public Utilities Commission has no jurisdiction with respect thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 139.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Government of VTA [100060. - 100100.]



  ARTICLE 1. Board of Directors [100060. - 100063.]

100060.

(a) The government of the VTA shall be vested in a board of directors which shall consist of 12 members, as follows:

(1) Two representatives of the county and one alternate who shall be members of the board of supervisors of the county, appointed by the board of supervisors.

(2) Five representatives of the City of San Jose and one alternate who shall be city council members or the mayor of the City of San Jose, appointed by the city council.

(3) Five city council members or mayors selected from among the city councils and mayors of all of the cities in
 the county, other than the City of San Jose, as provided by agreements among those cities. The agreements may provide for the appointment of alternates, who shall be city council members or mayors, for those city representatives.

(b) An alternate may vote in the place of a director represented by that alternate if the director is absent.

(c) To the extent possible, the appointing powers shall appoint individuals who have expertise, experience, or knowledge relative to transportation issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 21.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100060.2.

Except as otherwise provided, the term of office for each director shall be two years and until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor. A successor shall be appointed not later than 30 days immediately upon the expiration of a director’s term. A vacancy exists whenever a director ceases to hold office on the city council or board of supervisors from which he or she was appointed. Any vacancy shall, within 60 days of its occurrence, be filled for the balance of the term by the body that made the original appointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 22.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100061.

The board of directors shall annually elect a chairperson who shall preside at all meetings. The board of directors shall also annually elect a vice chairperson, who, in the event of the chairperson’s absence or inability to act, shall act as chairperson, and, while so acting, shall have all of the power and obligations of the chairperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 23.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100062.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and no act of the board shall be valid unless at least seven concur therein. The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance. All meetings of the board shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 254, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

100062.1.

(a) No ordinance, except an urgency ordinance, shall be passed by the board on the day of its introduction, nor within three days thereafter, nor at any time other than at a regular or adjourned regular meeting. The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be as follows:

“The Board of Directors of the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority ordains as follows:”

(b) All ordinances shall be signed by the chairperson of the board or the vice chairperson and attested by the secretary. Before the expiration of 15 days after the passage of an ordinance, it shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation within the boundaries of
 the VTA as provided by law for ordinances adopted by counties. An order entered in the minutes of the board that the ordinance has been duly published is prima facie proof of publication.

(c) Urgency ordinances shall be adopted in the same manner as provided by law for the adoption of urgency ordinances by counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 24.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100063.

The board may fix the amount of compensation to be paid each member of the board for services and for each meeting attended by the member. The compensation shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each meeting of the board attended by the member or for each day’s service rendered as a member by request of the board, not exceeding a total of six days in any calendar month, together with any expenses incident thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 254, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties of Board of Directors [100070. - 100071.]

100070.

The board of directors is the legislative body of the VTA and shall determine all questions of VTA policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 26.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100071.

It shall be the duty of the board of directors and it shall have the power to:

(a) Determine the transit facilities to be acquired and constructed by the VTA, the manner of operation, and the means to finance them.

(b) Adopt an annual budget for the VTA that provides for the compensation of its officers and employees.

(c) Fix rates, rentals, charges, and classifications of transit service operated by the VTA.

(d) Adopt an administrative code that prescribes the powers and duties of VTA officers, the method of
 appointment of VTA employees, and the methods, procedures, and systems for the operation and management of the VTA.

(e) Adopt rules and regulations governing the use of transit facilities owned or operated by the VTA.

(f) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the VTA to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant or public accountant.

(g) Adopt reasonable rules and regulations providing for the administration of employer-employee relations.

(h) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 27.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Advisory Commission [100080. - 100082.]

100080.

The board of directors shall establish at least one advisory committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 254, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

100082.

The advisory committees shall provide advice to the board of directors on matters of VTA policy and shall have additional duties as provided by the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 28.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Officers [100090. - 100091.]

100090.

The officers of the VTA shall consist of the members of the board of directors, the chairperson and vice chairperson of the board, a secretary, a general manager, a general counsel, and any other officers that the board deems necessary and provides for by ordinance or resolution. The general manager and general counsel shall be appointed and may be removed by the affirmative votes of a majority of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 29.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100091.

The secretary and those assistants that the board designates may administer all oaths or affirmations required by law, including the oath of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 373, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. General Manager [100100. - 100100.]

100100.

The power and duties of the general manager are all of the following:

(a) To head the administrative branch of the VTA and to be responsible to the board of directors for the proper administration of all affairs of the VTA.

(b) To appoint, supervise, suspend, or remove VTA officers other than the members of the board and officers appointed by the board.

(c) To supervise and direct the preparation of the annual budget for the board and be responsible for its administration after its adoption.

(d) To formulate and
 present to the board plans for transit and other transportation facilities within the boundaries of the VTA and the means to finance them.

(e) To supervise the planning, acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the transit facilities of the VTA and other transportation facilities within the boundaries of the VTA, as needed.

(f) To attend all meetings of the board.

(g) To prepare and submit to the board as soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year a complete report of the finances and administrative activities of the VTA for the preceding year.

(h) To perform other and additional duties as the board may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 31.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Powers and Functions of VTA [100110. - 100256.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [100110. - 100115.5.]

100110.

The VTA has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at its pleasure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 33.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100111.

The VTA may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 34.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100112.

All claims for money or damages against the VTA are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 35.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100113.

(a) The VTA shall not levy any tax pursuant to Section 100250 unless approved by the electors voting on the measure in accordance with Article XIIIC of the California Constitution at a special election called for that purpose by the board of directors.

(b) Whenever a bond election is held to authorize incurring bonded indebtedness pursuant to Section 100400, the ordinance calling the election shall include a statement of the tax or taxes to be levied or continued to be levied and used, to the extent those taxes are required to pay principal of and interest on the bonds as the same become due, to provide any sinking fund payments required therefor, or to
 create or maintain any reserve fund required therefor. A vote in favor of the issuance of the bonds shall authorize the board to levy and collect such taxes. The ordinance levying the taxes shall not be repealed until all bonds payable from the revenues derived from the taxes have been fully paid or provision has been made for their payment in full.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 36.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100114.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, VTA elections shall be called, held, and conducted as provided by the Uniform District Election Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 37.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100115.
